Nebraska, session 109, LB195.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-470, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-470 (1) A health professional who is authorized to prescribe or
dispense an opioid overdose reversal medication naloxone, if acting with
reasonable care, may prescribe, administer, or dispense such medication
naloxone to any of the following persons without being subject to
administrative action or criminal prosecution:
(a) A person who is apparently experiencing or who is likely to experience
an opioid-related overdose; or
(b) A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist a
person who is apparently experiencing or who is likely to experience an opioid-
related overdose.
(2) A family member, friend, or any other person, including school
personnel, who is in a position to assist a person who is apparently
experiencing or who is likely to experience an opioid-related overdose, other
than an emergency responder or peace officer, is not subject to actions under
the Uniform Credentialing Act, administrative action, or criminal prosecution
if the person, acting in good faith:
(a) Obtains an opioid overdose reversal medication , obtains naloxone from
a health professional, pursuant to or a prescription, or over the counter; for
naloxone from a health professional and
(b) Administers such medication administers the naloxone obtained from the
health professional or acquired pursuant to the prescription to a person who is
apparently experiencing an opioid-related overdose.
(3) An emergency responder who, acting in good faith, obtains an opioid
overdose reversal medication naloxone from the emergency responder's emergency
medical service organization and administers such medication the naloxone to a
person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related overdose shall not be:
(a) Subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution; or
(b) Personally liable in any civil action to respond in damages as a
result of his or her acts of commission or omission arising out of and in the
course of his or her rendering such care or services or arising out of his or
her failure to act to provide or arrange for further medical treatment or care
for the person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related overdose,
unless the emergency responder caused damage or injury by his or her willful,
wanton, or grossly negligent act of commission or omission. This subdivision
shall not affect the liability of such emergency medical service organization
for the emergency responder's acts of commission or omission.
(4) A peace officer or law enforcement employee who, acting in good faith,
obtains an opioid overdose reversal medication naloxone from the peace
officer's or employee's law enforcement agency and administers such medication
the naloxone to a person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related
overdose shall not be:
(a) Subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution; or
(b) Personally liable in any civil action to respond in damages as a
result of his or her acts of commission or omission arising out of and in the
course of his or her rendering such care or services or arising out of his or
her failure to act to provide or arrange for further medical treatment or care
for the person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related overdose,
unless the peace officer or employee caused damage or injury by his or her
willful, wanton, or grossly negligent act of commission or omission. This
subdivision shall not affect the liability of such law enforcement agency for
the peace officer's or employee's acts of commission or omission.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Administer has the same meaning as in section 38-2806;
(b) Dispense has the same meaning as in section 38-2817;
(c) Emergency responder means an emergency medical responder, an emergency
medical technician, an advanced emergency medical technician, or a paramedic
licensed under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act or practicing
pursuant to the EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact;
(d) Health professional means a physician, physician assistant, nurse
practitioner, or pharmacist licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(e) Law enforcement agency means a police department, a town marshal, the
office of sheriff, or the Nebraska State Patrol;
(f) Law enforcement employee means an employee of a law enforcement
agency, a contractor of a law enforcement agency, or an employee of such
-1-

LB195 LB195
2025 2025
contractor who regularly, as part of his or her duties, handles, processes, or
is likely to come into contact with any evidence or property which may include
or contain opioids;
(g) Opioid overdose reversal medication means any lifesaving medication
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for reversing an
opioid overdose, whether obtained by prescription, from a health professional,
or over the counter, and includes, but is not limited to, naloxone and
nalmefene Naloxone means naloxone hydrochloride; and
(h) Peace officer has the same meaning as in section 49-801.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-470, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-2-